th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > บาสเก็ตบอล > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ห่วงบาสเกตบอล: แผ่นหลังของห่วงบาสเกตบอล; ฐานแป้นบาสเกตบอล; ไฟส่องแป้นบาสเกตบอล; ฉากยึดและพุกยึดแป้นบาสเกตบอล; ที่รองสำหรับห่วงบาสเกตบอล; เสาห่วงของบาสเกตบอล; ตาข่ายบาสเกตบอล; อุปกรณ์ส่งลูกบาสเกตบอลกลับ; ห่วงบาสเกตบอล
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Basket-ball > Accessoires et paniers de basket-ball: Panneaux de basket-ball; Bases pour paniers de basket-ball; Éclairages pour paniers de basket-ball; Supports de montage et kits d'ancrage pour paniers de basket-ball; Mousse de protection pour paniers de basket-ball; Poteaux de basket-ball; Filets de basket-ball; Systèmes de retour de ballon de basket-ball; Anneaux de basket-ball
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Баскетбол > Детали и аксессуары для баскетбольных щитов и корзин: Баскетбольные щиты; Основания для баскетбольных стоек; Подсветка для баскетбольных колец; Монтажные кронштейны и анкерные комплекты для баскетбольных колец; Протекторы для баскетбольных стоек; Стойки для баскетбольных щитов; Сетки для баскетбольных корзин; Системы возврата баскетбольных мячей; Кольца для баскетбольных корзин
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Košarka > Dijelovi i dodaci za košarkaški obruč: Ploče za košarku; Baze za koš za košarku; Svjetla za koš za košarku; Nosači i kompleti sidra za košarkaški obruč; Podstava za košarkaški obruč; Stalci za košarku; Košarkaške mreže; Sustavi za vraćanje košarkaških lopti; Obruči za košarku
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Basketball > Basketball Hoop Parts & Accessories: Basketball Backboards; Basketball Hoop Bases; Basketball Hoop Lights; Basketball Hoop Mounting Brackets & Anchor Kits; Basketball Hoop Padding; Basketball Hoop Posts; Basketball Nets; Basketball Return Systems; Basketball Rims
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Μπάσκετ > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ στεφάνης μπάσκετ: Ταμπλό μπάσκετ; Βάσεις μπασκέτας; Φώτα μπασκέτας; Βραχίονες στήριξης και κιτ αγκύρωσης μπασκέτας; Επενδύσεις στεφάνης μπάσκετ; Στύλοι στεφάνης μπάσκετ; Δίχτυα μπάσκετ; Συστήματα επιστροφής μπάλας μπάσκετ; Στεφάνες μπάσκετ
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Basquete > Peças e acessórios do aro da cesta de basquete: Tabelas de basquete; Bases para cesta de basquete; Luzes para aro de basquete; Kits de fixação e suportes de montagem para cesta de basquete; Acolchoado para aro de basquete; Tabela de basquete com pé; Redes de basquete; Sistemas de retorno de bola de basquete; Aros da cesta de basquete
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Mingi de baschet > Piese și accesorii pentru coșul de baschet: Plăci coș de baschet; Baze pentru coșul de baschet; Lumini pentru coșul de baschet; Suporturi de montare și kituri de ancorare pentru coș de baschet; Inserție coș de baschet; Stâlpi pentru coș de baschet; Plase de baschet; Sisteme de returnare a mingii de baschet; Borduri coș de baschet
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 籃球 > 籃球框零件/配件: 籃球板; 籃球架底座; 籃球框照明燈; 籃球框安裝支架與錨定套組; 籃球框襯墊; 籃框支柱; 籃球網; 籃球回球系統; 籃框
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Basketbal > Onderdelen en accessoires voor basketbalringen: Basketbalborden; Voeten voor basketbalringen; Verlichting voor basketbalringen; Montagebeugels en ankersetjes voor basketbalringen; Bescherming basketbalringen; Basketbalpalen; Basketbalnetten; Basketbalretoursystemen; Basketbalringen
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 篮球用品 > 篮球框铁环零件/配件: 篮球篮板; 篮球架底座; 篮球架照明灯; 篮球架安装支架与地锚套件; 篮球架护垫; 篮球架柱; 篮球网; 篮球回传系统; 篮球框
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Basketbal > Diely a príslušenstvo k basketbalovým košom: Basketbalové dosky; Základne na basketbalový kôš; Svetlá na basketbalový kôš; Montážne konzoly a kotviace sady pre basketbalové koše; Výplň basketbalového koša; Stĺpiky na basketbalový kôš; Basketbalové siete; Systémy na vrátenie basketbalových loptičiek; Basketbalové ráfiky
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Košarka > Deli in dodatki za košarkarske obroče: Hrbtne plošče za košarko; Košarka Podstavki za koše; Košarka Luči za koše; Kompleti montažnih nosilcev in pritrditvenih nastavkov za košarkarske koše; Obloge za košarkarske koše; Stojala za košarkarske koše; Košarkarske mreže; Sistemi za vračanje košarkarskih žog; Obroči za košarkarske koše
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Basketball > Basketballkurve – dele og tilbehør: Basketballbagplader; Baser til basketballkurve; Belysning til basketballkurve; Monteringsbeslag og forankringssæt til basketballkurve; Beklædning til basketballring; Basketballstandere; Basketballnet; Boldretursystemer til basketball; Basketballkurveringe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Baloncesto > Piezas y accesorios para canastas de baloncesto: Tableros de baloncesto; Bases para aros de básquetbol; Luces para aros de básquetbol; Kits de anclaje y soportes de montaje para aros de básquetbol; Protectores para canastas de baloncesto; Postes para canastas de baloncesto; Redes de baloncesto; Sistemas de retorno de balones de básquetbol; Aros de baloncesto
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Basketball > Basketballkorbteile & -zubehör: Basketball-Korbbretter; Basketballkorb-Ständer; Beleuchtung für Basketballkörbe; Montagehalterungen & Verankerungs-Pakete für Basketballkörbe; Schutzverkleidung für Basketballkörbe; Basketballständer; Basketballnetze; Basketball-Rücklaufsysteme; Basketballringe
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Basketball > Kurvdeler og -tilbehør for basketball: Bakplater for basketball; Baser for basketballkurver; Belysning for basketballkurver; Festebraketter og forankringssett for basketballkurver; Kurvtrekk for basketball; Kurvstativer for basketball; Basketballnett; Ballretursystemer for basketball; Basketballringer
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Basketbol > Basketbol Potası Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Basketbol Panyaları; Basketbol potası tabanları; Basketbol potası aydınlatmaları; Basketbol potası montaj braketleri ve ankraj kitleri; Basketbol Pota Koruması; Basketbol Pota Direkleri; Basketbol Ağları; Basketbol top iade sistemleri; Basketbol Çemberleri
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > バスケットボール > バスケットゴール関連用品: バスケットゴール用バックボード; バスケットボールフープ用ベース; バスケットボールフープ用ライト; バスケットボールフープ用取り付けブラケット・アンカーキット; バスケットゴール用パッド; バスケットゴール用ポール; バスケットゴール用ネット; バスケットボールリターンシステム; バスケットゴール用リング
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Basketbal > Díly a příslušenství k basketbalovým košům: Basketbalové desky; Základny basketbalových košů; Osvětlení basketbalových košů; Montážní držáky a kotevní sady na basketbalové koše; Ochrana stojanu basketbalového koše; Stojany na basketbalové koše; Basketbalové síťky; Systémy na vracení basketbalových míčů; Basketbalové obroučky
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Kosárlabda > Kosárlabdakarika-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Kosárlabdapalánkok; Kosárlabda állványtalpak; Kosárlabdapalánk-világítás; Kosárlabdapalánk rögzítőkonzolok és horgonykészletek; Kosárlabdakarika-bélés; Kosárlabdakarika-oszlopok; Kosárlabdahálók; Kosárlabda visszatérítő rendszerek; Kosárlabdagyűrűk
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basquetebol > Acessórios e peças para aro de basquetebol: Tabelas para basquetebol; Bases para cestos de basquetebol; Luzes para cestos de basquetebol; Suportes de montagem e kits de ancoragem para cestos de basquetebol; Revestimento de aro para basquetebol; Postes de aro para basquetebol; Redes para basquetebol; Sistemas de devolução para basquetebol; Arcos para basquetebol
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Koripallo > Koripallokorin osat ja tarvikkeet: Koripallokorin taustalevyt; Koripallokorin jalustat; Koripallokorin valot; Koripallokorin kiinnikkeet ja ankkurointipakkaukset; Koripallokorin pehmuste; Koripallotelineet; Koripalloverkot; Koripallon palautusjärjestelmät; Koripallorenkaat
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng rổ > Linh kiện & Phụ kiện vành bóng rổ: Bảng gắn sau rổ; Đế trụ bóng rổ; Đèn vòng bóng rổ; Bộ neo và giá treo vòng bóng rổ; Đệm bảo vệ rổ bóng rổ; Trụ bóng rổ; Giỏ bóng rổ; Hệ thống trả bóng rổ; Khung chụp bóng rổ
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Баскетбол > Части и аксесоари за баскетболен кош: Баскетболни табла; Основи за баскетболен кош; Светлини за баскетболен кош; Монтажни скоби за баскетболен кош и анкерни комплекти; Защита за баскетболен кош; Стълбове за баскетболни кошове; Баскетболни мрежи; Системи за връщане на баскетболни топки; Баскетболни обръчи
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Krepšinis > Krepšinio lankų dalys ir priedai: Krepšinio lentos; Krepšinio stovų pagrindai; Krepšinio lankų apšvietimas; Krepšinio lankų tvirtinimo laikikliai ir inkaravimo rinkiniai; Krepšinio lankų paminkštinimai; Krepšinio lankų stulpai; Krepšinio tinkleliai; Krepšinio kamuolio grąžinimo sistemos; Krepšinio lankai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Koszykówka > Części i akcesoria do koszy: Tablice do koszykówki; Podstawy koszy do koszykówki; Oświetlenie koszy do koszykówki; Wsporniki montażowe i zestawy kotwiące do koszykówki; Obicia do koszy; Słupy koszy; Siatki do koszykówki; Systemy zwrotu piłek do koszykówki; Obręcze do koszy
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Basket > Parti e accessori canestro basket: Tabelloni da basket; Basi per canestri da basket; Luci per canestri da basket; Staffe di montaggio e kit di ancoraggio per canestri da basket; Cuscinetti per anelli da basket; Pali per canestri da basket; Reti da basket; Sistemi di ritorno palla da basket; Cerchi da basket
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 농구 > 농구 링 부품/부대용품: 농구 백보드; 농구 골대 베이스; 농구 골대 조명; 농구 골대 마운팅 브래킷 및 앵커 키트; 농구 골대 하단 보호대; 농구 골대 포스트; 농구 골대 그물; 농구 리턴 시스템; 농구 골대 링
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Basketboll > Delar och tillbehör till basketkorgar: Basketstoppbrädor; Fotställningar för basketkorgar; Belysning för basketkorgar; Monteringsfästen och förankringskit för basketkorgar; Stoppning för basketbollringar; Basketstolpar; Basketnät; Retursystem för basketbollar; Basketringar